Massachusetts, session 194th, S821.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 20 of Chapter 171 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- Any credit
union may compensate each of the members of the board of directors for his or her services as a
member of the board or any committee thereof a sum that may, from time to time, be fixed by
the members at an annual meeting.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1